FST/ckt/ckt_adj.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %+ADJ %+SG %+PL %+ADV %+ADP %+DAT %+ABS %+ALL %+ABL %+ESS


LEXICON Root

Adjective ;
Adverb ;
Adp  ;

LEXICON Adjective

джинчыӄонагыԓьын   Ainf;
миӈкыри	           Ainf;
Вытгытчьэн         Ainf;
ыннэнчьэн          Ainf;
ӈаргыно	           Ainf;
ынпычьын	   Ainf;
нанӈэнчьан	   Ainf;
ӈирэӄычьын         Ainf;
гыргочайпы	   Ainf;
мынгытычьын        Ainf;

LEXICON Ainf
%+ADJ%+ABS%+SG:0   #;
%+ADJ%+ABS%+PL:^чьыт   #;
%+ADJ%+DAT:^гты  #;

LEXICON Adverb 

миӈкыри            Avinf;
миӈкы              Avinf;

LEXICON Avinf
%+ADV%+ALL:0    #;
!%+ADV%+ESS:0    #;

LEXICON Adp 

гыргочайпы         Adinf;


LEXICON Adinf
%+ADP%+ABL:0   #;
